Tennessee statutes. Title 26 Execution
Chapter 3

Levy of Execution

26-3-101. Personalty levied on first.

Executions shall be levied on the goods and chattels of the defendant, in the first instance, if any there be; but if, to the best of the officer's knowledge, there be no such goods and chattels, or not sufficient to answer the plaintiff's demands, the same shall be executed upon the lands and tenements.

Code 1858, § 3026 (deriv. Acts 1794, ch. 1, § 23); Shan., § 4754; Code 1932, § 8888; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-401.

Cross-References. Costs to plaintiff for transportation and storage of property levied upon, § 26-3-117.

Proceedings on distress warrant for collection of taxes, § 67-1-1202.

Real defendant in action against levying officer, §§ 20-1-117, 20-1-118.

Registration of abstract, §§ 25-5-103, 25-5-107 — 25-5-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 11, 20.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Forms of Relief, 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 400.

Judicial Reform at the Lowest Level: A Model Statute for Small Claims Courts, Part III, 28 Vand. L. Rev. 747.

The Collection of Debts from Insolvent and Fully-Mortgaged Debtors (John A. Walker, Jr.), 43 Tenn. L. Rev. 399.

26-3-102. Growing crops.

A levy may be made upon a growing crop, but not until November 15 after such crop is matured, and then only subject to the landlord's lien, if any. If, however, the owner of the crop absconds, conceals their whereabouts, or leaves the country, an attachment or execution may be levied on a standing crop at any time.

Code 1858, § 3036 (deriv. Acts 1833, ch. 20, §§ 1-3); Shan., § 4764; Code 1932, § 8894; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-402.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 12, 17, 22; 13 Tenn. Juris., Fraudulent and Voluntary Conveyances, § 7.

26-3-103. Corporate property.

An execution against a corporation may be levied on its choses in action, as well as on the goods and chattels, lands and tenements, of such corporation; and in case of a levy on choses in action, the court may appoint a receiver to collect or conserve the same.

Code 1858, § 3037 (deriv. Acts 1845-1846, ch. 55, § 4); Shan., § 4765; mod. Code 1932, § 8895; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-403.

Cross-References. Costs to plaintiff for transportation and storage of property levied upon, § 26-3-117.

Writ against corporation, § 26-1-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 16; 21 Tenn. Juris., Receivers, § 7.

26-3-104. Indemnity bond of plaintiff.

No sheriff or other officer shall be required to levy an execution on any property the title of which is disputed, or to sell the same after levy, unless the plaintiff will first give bond and security to such officer, to indemnify the sheriff or other officer against all damages and costs in consequence of the levy or sale.

Code 1858, § 3032 (deriv. Acts 1825, ch. 40, § 2); Shan., § 4760; Code 1932, § 8893; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-404.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Attorney General Opinions. Requirement of an indemnity bond by a sheriff for the execution of a writ of possession, OAG 07-129, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 129 (8/27/07).

26-3-105. Principal's property sold before surety's.

Where the judgment or decree is against a principal and the principal's surety, it shall be the duty of the officer having the collection thereof to exhaust the property of the principal, both real and personal, before proceeding to sell the property of the surety.

“Surety,” in this section, shall embrace accommodation endorsers, stayors, and all other persons whose liability on the debt or contract is posterior to that of another.

The surety shall, if requested by the officer, show the property of the principal, to entitle the surety to the benefit of this section.

Code 1858, §§ 3028, 3029 (deriv. Acts 1820 Private, ch. 120, § 6; 1843-1844, ch. 32, § 1); Shan., §§ 4756, 4757; Code 1932, §§ 8889a, 8890; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-405.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, §§ 20, 29; 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, § 12; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, §§ 2, 29.

26-3-106. Order of levy on parties secondarily liable.

After exhausting the property of the principal, it shall be the duty of the officer to subject the property of the other parties in the order of their liability on the debt or contract.

The party subsequently liable shall, if requested by the officers, show the property of the prior liable party to secure the benefit of this section.

Code 1858, § 3030 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 32, § 1); Shan., § 4758; Code 1932, § 8891; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-406.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions § 20; 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, § 12.

26-3-107. Order of liability stated.

All the parties shall be considered as equally liable, in all cases, unless the order of liability is shown to the court, and recited in the judgment or decree.

The clerk issuing execution on the judgment or decree containing such recital shall state the order of liability in the execution.

Code 1858, § 3031 (deriv. Acts 1843-1844, ch. 32, § 2); Shan., § 4759; Code 1932, § 8892; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-407.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions § 20; 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, § 12; 23 Tenn. Juris., Suretyship, § 29.

26-3-108. Endorsement of description of property.

A description of the property levied on, with the date of the levy, shall be endorsed upon or appended to the execution.

Code 1858, § 3027; Shan., § 4755; Code 1932, § 8889; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-408.

Law Reviews.

Enforcement of Judgments in Tennessee, 22 Tenn. L. Rev. 873.

Enforcing Money Judgments in Tennessee (Lonnie C. Rich), 4 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 65.

26-3-109. Delivery bond of defendant.

When personal property is levied on, if the defendant shall give bond, payable to the creditor, in double the amount of the execution, conditioned to deliver the property levied on to the proper officer by twelve o'clock (12:00) noon of the day of sale, the sheriff may restore the property to the defendant.

Code 1858, § 3044 (deriv. Acts 1801, ch. 13, § 1); Shan., § 4772; Code 1932, § 8902; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-409.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 12 Tenn. Juris., Executions, § 26; 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, §§ 3-5.

26-3-110. Liability on forfeited delivery bond.

The sureties on a forfeited delivery bond shall not be held responsible for more than the value of the property specified in the bond, and not delivered according to its condition; and the value of the property, if not agreed upon, shall be ascertained in a summary way by a jury of five (5) disinterested persons, summoned by the officer making the levy or holding the execution, whose valuation shall be final.

Code 1858, § 3045 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 25, § 1); Shan., § 4773; Code 1932, § 8903; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-410.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, §§ 5, 11, 20.

26-3-111. Levy on forfeited bond — Alias execution.

The delivery bond, if forfeited, shall be, in the hands of the officer holding it, a sufficient authority to levy upon and sell so much of the property of the sureties as will satisfy the amount for which they have made themselves liable, and shall also be a sufficient authority to the clerk to whom the same may be returned to issue an alias or pluries execution, as the case may be, against the defendant to the judgment, and against the sureties on the bond, without any judgment upon the bond.

Code 1858, § 3046 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 25, §§ 2, 3); Shan., § 4774; Code 1932, § 8904; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-411.

26-3-112. Defendants refusing to join in delivery bond.

If there are more defendants than one (1) in the original execution, and any of them do not join in the delivery bond, the sureties on such bond shall be first liable before those defendants who refuse to join, to the extent of the liability incurred by the bond; but in the event the debt, or any portion of it, is paid by the surety on the bond, the surety on the bond shall be substituted to the rights of the defendant for whom that person is surety, as against the other defendants.

Code 1858, § 3047; Shan., § 4775; Code 1932, § 8905; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-412.

26-3-113. Order of levy after forfeiture of delivery bond.

Upon forfeiture of the bond, the officer holding the execution shall levy immediately upon the property of the defendants who join in the bond, to satisfy the debt and costs to the plaintiffs and double costs to the officer; and if there shall not be property enough of these defendants found to satisfy the execution, such officer shall levy upon property of the sureties sufficient to satisfy so much of the amount as they had become liable for; and if the execution is still unsatisfied, it shall be the officer's duty to go upon such of the original defendants, if any, as did not join in the delivery bond.

Code 1858, § 3048 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 25, §§ 2, 3); Shan., § 4776; Code 1932, § 8906; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-413.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 22 Tenn. Juris., Replevy and Forthcoming Bonds, § 10.

26-3-114. Return of unsatisfied execution.

If unable to obtain satisfaction of the debt before the officer is bound by law to return the execution, the officer shall return the execution and bond together, with a proper endorsement of the facts, and thereupon an alias or pluries execution, as the case may be, shall issue against all parties, with endorsements showing the amounts paid upon any former execution, and specifying the amount for which the sureties are bound, if less than the unsatisfied balance.

Code 1858, § 3049 (deriv. Acts 1831, ch. 25, §§ 2, 3); Shan., § 4777; Code 1932, § 8907; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-414.

26-3-115. Second delivery bond.

No second delivery bond shall be taken after forfeiture of the first.

Code 1858, § 3050 (deriv. Acts 1829, ch. 51, § 1); Shan., § 4778; Code 1932, § 8908; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-415.

26-3-116. Delivery bonds on official default.

The provisions of §§ 26-3-109 — 26-3-115, allowing delivery bonds, do not apply to executions issued on judgments or decrees against sheriffs, coroners, or other officers of court against whom judgment is obtained for failing to pay over money collected or paid to them in an official capacity, and the clerk shall endorse on all such executions, “No delivery bond to be taken.”

Code 1858, § 3051; Shan., § 4779; Code 1932, § 8909; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 26-416.

26-3-117. Costs to be paid by plaintiff — Recovery from defendant.

In addition to any other fees required by law for levy of execution on tangible personal property, the plaintiff in a civil proceeding who causes an execution to be issued for levy of personal property shall pay the cost incurred by the court, sheriff, or other officers for transportation of the attached property to a storage facility, storage fees, advertisement fees, court costs, and any other necessary cost incurred by such officials. The plaintiff shall have a right of recovery from the defendant for all such costs.

Acts 1978, ch. 652, § 1; T.C.A., § 26-417.